Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NORTH ZUMBRO SANITARY DISTRICT; WASTEWATER TREATMENT FACILITY.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $44,800,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the joint powers sanitary district created pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 471.59, comprising the cities of Zumbrota, Goodhue, Pine Island, and Wanamingo, to design, engineer, permit, construct, and equip a new state-of-the-art regional wastewater treatment facility to be located in Goodhue County and to serve as a regional wastewater facility prototype. This facility shall provide wastewater treatment service for the Elk Run settlement lands of the Prairie Island Indian Community, which shall connect to existing wastewater infrastructure in the city of Pine Island. This appropriation includes money for improvements and betterments of a capital nature, including the construction of infrastructure, necessary to connect the new facility to the communities in the sanitary district and for the facility to serve its intended purpose. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $44,800,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end